Missouri, session 2026, HB1896.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 217, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 217.158, to read as follows:
217.158. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any person who
2 is serving a sentence for a marijuana-related offense may petition the sentencing court
3 to vacate the sentence and order immediate release from incarceration and other
4 supervision by the department of corrections. When the petitioner is serving a sentence
5 only for a marijuana-related offense or offenses, the department shall immediately
6 release such person from custody and supervision.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.